Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. Local Government Self-Insurance Program

§ 1-42-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

§ 1-42-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to definitions.

§ 1-42-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to local government insurance account; creation; authorized payments.

§ 1-42-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to interfund transfer; repayment to account; investment of funds.

§ 1-42-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to creation of policy board; powers and duties of board; powers and duties of risk manager.

§ 1-42-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to initial assessments and assessments to repay interfund transfers.

§ 1-42-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to claims procedures; compromise or settlement of claims; authority.

§ 1-42-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to reports.

§ 1-42-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to local government insurance program not subject to insurance laws.

§ 1-42-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to confidential information.

§ 1-42-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to applicability.

§ 1-42-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009,
ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 81, § 1, related to self-insurance not considered a purchase of insurance coverage.

Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 1-42-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009,
ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1997, ch. 180, § 1, related to proposal to transfer administration of local government self-insurance account, transfer after approval, and effect.

Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.